Virginia statutes. Title 22.1. Education.
Article 3. Licensure.
§ 22.1-289.027.
Offenses; penalty.

Any person, and each officer and each member of the governing board of any association or corporation that operates a child day program or family day system, shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor if he:

Interferes with any representative of the Superintendent in the discharge of his duties under this chapter;

Makes to the Superintendent or any representative of the Superintendent any report or statement, with respect to the operation of any child day program or family day system, that is known by such person to be false or untrue;

Operates or engages in the conduct of a child day program or family day system without first obtaining a license as required by this chapter or after such license has been revoked or suspended or has expired and not been renewed. No violation shall occur if the agency has applied to the Department for renewal prior to the expiration date of the license. Every day’s violation of this subdivision shall constitute a separate offense; or

Operates or engages in the conduct of a child day program or family day system serving more persons than the maximum stipulated in the license.

History.

2020, cc. 860, 861.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 860 and 861, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021, except that § 22.1-289.04 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, shall become effective in due course.”

§ 22.1-289.028.
Misleading advertising prohibited.

No child day program or family day system shall make, publish, disseminate, circulate, or place before the public or cause, directly or indirectly, to be made, published, disseminated, circulated or placed before the public in this Commonwealth, in a newspaper or other publication; in the form of a book, notice, handbill, poster, blueprint, map, bill, tag, label, circular, pamphlet, or letter; or via electronic mail, website, automatic mailing list services (listservs), newsgroups, facsimile, chat rooms; or in any other way an advertisement of any sort regarding services or anything so offered to the public, which advertisement contains any promise, assertion, representation or statement of fact that is untrue, deceptive, or misleading.

History.

2020, cc. 860, 861.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 860 and 861, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021, except that § 22.1-289.04 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, shall become effective in due course.”

§ 22.1-289.029.
Duty of attorneys for the Commonwealth.

It shall be the duty of the attorney for the Commonwealth of every county and city to prosecute all violations of this chapter.

History.

2020, cc. 860, 861.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 860 and 861, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021, except that § 22.1-289.04 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, shall become effective in due course.”